DIAGNOSTICS -

ACTIVE HEIGHT CONTROL SUSPENSION & DI-275

SKYHOOK TEMS

DI3GV-03

DTC

C 1786 / 86 Height Select Switch Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

This circuit sending the signal to ECU in order to adjust the height to the aimed height selected by the height
select switch.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
* Heightselect switch
C1786/86 Height select switch signal does not change. * Heightselect switch circuit
» Suspension control ECU
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DI-276 DIAGNOSTICS - ACTIVEHEIGHT CONTROL SUSPENSION &
SKYHOOK TEMS

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check output signal of height select switch.

INCASEOFUSINGHAND -HELDTESTER:
PREPARATION:
(a) Connectthehand -heldtestertothe DLCS.
(b) Turntheignition switch ON and pushthe hand -heldtester main switch ON.
(c) Selectthe DATALIST mode onthe hand -heldtester.
CHECK:
Checkthe height select switch condition displayed onthe hand -heldtesterwhen pushing”UP”and " DOWN”
button of the height select switch.
OK:
When "UP” button is pushed: "ON” is displayed for height select up switch condition.
When "DOWN?” button is pushed: "ON” is displayed for height select down switch condition.

ON INCASEOFNOTUSINGHAND -HELDTESTER:
@ UPSW DNSW PREPARATION:
Remove the suspension control ECU with connectors still con-
nected.
CHECK:
O/ ) (@  Turn the ignition switch ON.
\\_// g (b) Measure voltage between terminals DNSW and UPSW of
l suspension control ECU connector and body ground
= F05743 when”DOWN” and ”"UP” button of height select switchiis
pushed.
OK:
Terminal Switch condition Voltage
"DOWN?” button pushed 9-14V
DNSW - Body ground
"UP” button pushed Below 1.5V
"UP” button pushed 9-14V
UPSW - Body ground
"DOWN”button pushed Below 1.5V

0K> No problem.
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DIAGNOSTICS - ACTIVE HEIGHT CONTROL SUSPENSION & DI-277
SKYHOOK TEMS

2 [ Check height select switch.

PREPARATION:

Suspension (@) Remove the suspension control switch.
Control

Switch (b) Disconnect the suspension control switch (for height se-
lect switch) connector.
CHECK:

"UP” Button

~ Measure resistance between terminals 5, 6 and 8 of suspen-

sion control switch (for height select switch) connector when

| gg;gg‘ "UP” and "DOWN?” button of the height select switch is pushed.
Switch OK:

) ., Terminal Switch condition Resistance

DOWN” Button "UP” button pushed 0 Q (Continuity)
5-8

"DOWN?” button pushed o Q (Open)
8 HD DD 68 "DOWN?” button pushed 0 Q (Continuity)

e H "UP” button pushed o Q (Open)

6 5

F05740

NG> Replace suspension control switch.

OK

3 | Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between height
select switch and suspension control ECU (See page IN-35).

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

Check and replace suspension control ECU.
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